Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1181.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2818XC (3) 91 jm/md S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 331.301, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 26. Beginning on July 1, 2025, a county 3 shall not assess or collect a franchise fee. 4 Sec. 2. Section 364.2, subsection 4, paragraph f, 5 subparagraph (1), subparagraph division (a), Code 2025, is 6 amended to read as follows: 7 (a) A franchise fee assessed by a city may be based upon 8 a percentage of gross revenues generated from sales of the 9 franchisee within the city not to exceed five percent except 10 as provided in subparagraph division (b), without regard to 11 the cityâs cost of inspecting, supervising, and otherwise 12 regulating the franchise. Beginning on July 1, 2025, a city 13 shall not assess a franchise fee related to any franchise 14 granted by the city. 15 Sec. 3. Section 480A.6, Code 2025, is amended to read as 16 follows: 17 480A.6 Franchise ordinance not superseded. 18 This chapter does not modify or supersede the rights and 19 obligations of a local government and the public utility 20 established by the terms of any existing or future franchise 21 granted, approved, and accepted pursuant to section 364.2, 22 subsection 4 . A For fiscal years beginning before July 1, 23 2025, a city which collects a city franchise fee from an entity 24 pursuant to section 364.2, subsection 4 , under an existing or 25 future franchise, shall not also collect a fee from that entity 26 under section 480A.3 . 27